Hawaii statutes.
§325-13
Rules. (a) For the purpose of carrying out this chapter, the director of
health, with the approval of the governor, may adopt, amend, or repeal such
rules as the director deems necessary which, when adopted in accordance with
chapter 91, shall have the force and effect of law.

(b) The rules shall be designed to:

(1) Protect the health and safety of the public;

(2) Establish appropriate levels of access to Hawaii
immunization registry information by authorized users;

(3) Establish data entry and reporting requirements
for health care providers; and

(4) Establish penalties for the failure to comply
with any rule. [L 1911, c 118, §17; RL 1925, §954; RL 1935, §1114; RL 1945,
§2341; RL 1955, §49-13; am L 1965, c 96, §35; HRS §325-13; gen ch 1985; am L
2010, c 113, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next